Utah statutes.
63M-1-1504.   Advisory board duties.

(1)  The advisory board shall:

(a)  establish and administer a Utah Pioneer Communities Program to assist communities in planning, managing, and implementing programs for the revitalization of business districts and the preservation of their distinct history, heritage, and culture as a basis for promoting stable, sustained economic growth through business expansion and tourism;

(b)  select, upon application by the community, communities to participate in the Utah Pioneer Communities Program;

(c)  enter into contracts to obtain services related to community preservation and tourism development;

(d)  with help from interested communities, individuals, and organizations, develop a plan describing the objectives of the Utah Pioneer Communities Program and the methods by which the advisory board shall:

(i)  coordinate the activities of that program with the private and public sector; and

(ii)  solicit and use private sector funding to revitalize business districts and provide services related to community preservation, tourism, and business development; and

(e)  coordinate and consult with other state and local or public and private entities that provide services to communities undertaking projects to provide services related to community preservation, tourism, and business development.

(2)  The advisory board shall provide training, technical assistance, and information on services related to community preservation, tourism, and business development.

